Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202583-171.01
Corrections and parole staff; performance metrics; requirements.

The department shall establish performance metrics for corrections and parole staff. Such metrics shall measure staff efficacy in providing rehabilitative and reentry services to committed offenders and parolees. Such metrics shall:

(1) Reflect a balanced approach that considers both compliance and enforcement measures as well as outcomes related to rehabilitation, reintegration, and public safety;

(2) Include indicators of progress for committed offenders and parolees, such as successful completion of treatment programs, educational attainment, employment status, and compliance with conditions of supervision;

(3) Emphasize the importance of providing supportive services, fostering positive relationships with committed offenders and parolees, and promoting successful community reentry; and

(4) Be aligned with best practices, stakeholder input, and the evolving goals and priorities of the criminal justice system.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 37;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 134.